Utah statutes.
39-6-67.   Accessory after the fact.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter who knows that a person has committed an offense punishable by this chapter may not receive, comfort, or assist the offender to hinder or prevent his apprehension, trial, or punishment.

(2)  The person shall be punished as a military court may direct.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1988 Special Session 2

